Pennsylvania, session 2025-2026, HB1780.
hereby enacts as follows:Section 1. Title 12 of the Pennsylvania Consolidated Statutes is amended by adding a chapter to read:CHAPTER 58TRANSPARENT PAYMENT FEESSec.6401. Scope of chapter.6402. Definitions.6403. Surcharge disclosure.6404. Enforcement.§ 6401. Scope of chapter.This chapter relates to informing consumers of payment surcharges related to the use of credit cards.1234567891011121314151617 § 6402. Definitions.The following words and phrases when used in this chapter shall have the meanings given to them in this section unless the context clearly indicates otherwise:"Credit card surcharge." A fee charged by a merchant to a consumer exclusively for credit card payment.§ 6403. Surcharge disclosure.(a) Disclosure required.--A merchant located in this Commonwealth, or doing business with a consumer located in this Commonwealth, shall disclose any credit card surcharge prior to the completion of a transaction.(b) Limit on surcharge.--The credit card surcharge may not exceed the merchant's actual cost to process the credit card payment.§ 6404. Enforcement.(a) Penalties.--A violation under this chapter shall be subject to penalties as determined by the Bureau of Consumer Protection in the Office of Attorney General.(b) Deposit of penalty fees.--Any penalty fees collected under this section shall be deposited into the General Fund.Section 2. This act shall take effect in 120 days.20250HB1780PN2189 - 2 - 123456789101112131415161718192021